Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.334

Miscellaneous state funds—Expenditures—Revenue from other than general fund.

Expenditures from any account described in RCW 43.79.330 shall be limited to the moneys credited to the account. No revenue from any source other than the general fund, which, except for the provisions of RCW 43.79.330 through 43.79.334, would have been paid into any fund other than the general fund, shall be used for any purpose except those purposes for which such moneys were authorized prior to the enactment hereof.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.79.334. Prior: 1955 c 370 s 5.]